Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 7

Hotels and Places of Public Accommodation

62-7-101. Rates to be posted.

The person in charge of and conducting any hotel shall post in a conspicuous place in each room of the hotel a card or sign plainly stating the price per day of each room and, in case the hotel is conducted on the American plan, the rate charged for meals. The cards or signs shall be dated as of the day on which they are posted.

This subsection (b) applies to hotels, motels and other places of public accommodations as defined by § 62-7-107 and referred to in this subsection (b) as “hotels.”

No person shall display or cause to be displayed any sign on the premises that includes, in dollars and cents, a statement of the rates charged at a hotel, unless twenty-five percent (25%) of all rooms in that facility are available at the quoted or advertised rate at all times the sign is posted.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1921, ch. 100, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3052a36b1; mod. Code 1932, § 5301; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 254, § 4; Acts 1977, ch. 478, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-701; Acts 1985, ch. 171, § 3; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Inspection of hotels, food service establishments, public swimming pools, title 68, ch. 14, part 3.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 1, 3.

62-7-102. Penalties.

Any person who violates § 62-7-101 or who charges any guest a rate in excess of the posted rates commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1921, ch. 100, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3052a36b2; Code 1932, § 5302; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-702; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-7-103. Safekeeping of valuables — Liability for loss.

When the proprietor of any hotel or inn provides a safe in the office in the hotel or inn or other convenient place for the safekeeping of any money, jewels or ornaments belonging to the guests of the hotel or inn or for any samples of merchandise of any kind carried by drummers or commercial travelers and notifies the guests of the hotel or inn by posting a notice that states the fact that in the safe or other convenient place money, jewels, ornaments or samples may be deposited in the rooms occupied by the guests, in a conspicuous manner, and if the guests neglect to deposit the money, jewels, ornaments or samples of merchandise in the safe or other convenient place, the proprietor is not liable for any loss of the money, jewels, ornaments or samples of merchandise sustained by the guest, by theft, or otherwise.

Acts 1921, ch. 49, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3593; Code 1932, § 6680; C. Supp. 1950, § 6680; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-703.

Cross-References. Checkrooms and losses therefrom, §§ 62-7-105, 62-7-106.

Restricted liability for losses from safe, § 62-7-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Drummers, § 1; 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 6.

Law Reviews.

Bailor Beware: Limitations and Exclusions of Liability in Commercial Bailments, 41 Vand. L. Rev. 129 (1988).

62-7-104. Restriction on liability for losses from safe.

The liability of the hotel or inn keeper for the safekeeping in the safe or other convenient place as provided in § 62-7-103 shall be limited to an amount not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300), unless a written contract is entered into providing a greater liability between the guest and the proprietor of the hotel or inn. The notice required to be posted by the proprietor of the hotel or inn in a conspicuous manner in the rooms occupied by the guests shall contain a recitation of the limitation of liability as provided in this section and the provision of greater liability being dependent upon a written contract between the proprietor and the guest.

Acts 1935 (E. S.), ch. 8, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6680; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-704.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 6.

Law Reviews.

Innkeeper Liability for Criminal Acts of Third Parties: Should Negligence of the Franchisee Extend to the Franchisor?, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189 (1984).

62-7-105. Checkroom — Liability for loss.

When the proprietor of any hotel or inn provides a checkroom or other convenient storage place in the hotel or inn building for the checking, storage and safekeeping of the personal baggage, other than money, jewels, ornaments and samples of merchandise carried by drummers or commercial travelers, or their guests, or those intending to become guests, and notifies the guests of the checkroom or other convenient storage place by posting a notice in its lobby or office in a conspicuous manner that the checkroom or other storage place has been provided, should any guest or person intending to become a guest neglect to deposit any such personal baggage other than money, jewels, ornaments or samples provided for in §§ 62-7-103 and 62-7-104 in the checkroom or storage place and leave the baggage in any other place than a room assigned to the guests, then the proprietor is not liable for the loss or theft of the baggage, unless the baggage was stolen by some employee of the hotel or inn; provided, that the hotel proprietor makes no extra charge for storing or checking property.

Acts 1921, ch. 49, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3593a1; Code 1932, § 6681; C. Supp. 1950, § 6681; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-705.

Cross-References. Restricted liability for losses from checkroom, § 62-7-106.

Safes and losses therefrom, §§ 62-7-103, 62-7-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 6.

Law Reviews.

Personal Property and Sales — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Gilbert S. Merritt, Jr.), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1189.

62-7-106. Restrictions on liability for losses from checkroom.

The liability of the hotel or innkeeper for personal baggage, as defined in § 62-7-105, shall be limited under all circumstances and conditions to an amount not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150), unless a written contract is entered into involving a greater liability between the proprietor of a hotel or inn and the guest, which limitation of liability and requirement of written contract for greater liability shall be contained in the notice required to be posted by the proprietor of the hotel or inn in a conspicuous manner in the lobby or office of the hotel or inn.

Acts 1935 (E. S.), ch. 7, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6681; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-706.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 6.

Law Reviews.

Bailor Beware: Limitations and Exclusions of Liability in Commercial Bailments, 41 Vand. L. Rev. 129 (1988).

62-7-107. Fraud in obtaining accommodations or restaurant services — Penalties.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accommodations” means lodging, services, goods, credit or valuable articles procured at a public establishment with lodging or under the pretense of having lodging, after having reasonable notice of the charges for same;

“Public establishment” means any food service establishment as defined in § 68-14-302 and also means any establishment that in the usual course of business offers overnight lodging to the general public on a day-to-day basis and also includes incidental businesses located and operated on the premises of the establishment primarily for the convenience of patrons of the establishment; and

“Restaurant services” means any services provided by a food service establishment as defined in § 68-14-302.

It is prima facie evidence of intent to defraud for any person to procure accommodations or restaurant services by false pretense or through show or pretense of baggage, key or other property under the false pretense of being registered at a public establishment, for any person to have procured accommodations or restaurant services and thereafter to abscond or surreptitiously remove or attempt to remove baggage or property without paying or offering to pay for the accommodations or for any person to receive restaurant services and thereafter to abscond or surreptitiously leave the premises without paying or offering to pay for the restaurant services.

Any person who pays for accommodations or restaurant services by check, draft or order for the payment of money shall be subject to §§ 39-14-121 and 39-14-122.

Any person who pays for accommodations or restaurant services by credit card shall be subject to §§ 39-14-118 and 39-14-119.

Accommodations or restaurant services paid for by check, draft, order or credit card at the time of registering at a public establishment, or subsequent to registering, up to and including the time of checking out of the public establishment shall, for all purposes, be considered as having been received simultaneously with the time the payment is made or instrument is passed.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, procures accommodations or restaurant services in any public establishment commits a Class C misdemeanor if the total amount procured is two hundred dollars ($200) or less. If the amount procured is more than two hundred dollars ($200), the person commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1895, ch. 67, § 1; Shan., § 3594; Code 1932, § 6682; Acts 1975, ch. 216, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-707; Acts 1982, ch. 789, §§ 1-8; Acts 1983, ch. 51, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 11, 78.

Compiler's Notes. The definition of “food service establishment” in 68-14-302, which is referred to in this section, was deleted pursuant to Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 23, as amended by Acts 2014, ch. 636, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 7.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

62-7-108. Sale of guests' baggage by hotels.

At any time after thirty (30) days after the person incurring such debt or obligation has left the hotel, inn or boardinghouse and the debt or obligation is still due and unpaid, the owner or proprietor of the hotel, inn or boardinghouse may sell at public auction, for cash, at the hotel or boardinghouse office, any or all baggage or property left at the hotel, inn or boardinghouse necessary to satisfy the debt or obligation, without any process of law or equity; provided, that the sale shall be advertised by written or printed posters for at least ten (10) days before the sale.

Acts 1895, ch. 67, § 3; Shan., § 3596; mod. Code 1932, § 6684; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-709.

Cross-References. Innkeeper's lien, title 66, ch. 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 3.

62-7-109. Right of owners to exclude persons from public places.

The rule of the common law giving a right of action to any person excluded from any hotel, public means of transportation or place of amusement is abrogated.

No keeper of any hotel or public house, or carrier of passengers for hire, except railways, street, interurban and commercial, or conductors, drivers or employees of the carrier or keeper, shall be bound or under any obligation to entertain, carry or admit any person whom the keeper, carrier, conductor, driver or their employees shall, for any reason whatever, choose not to entertain, carry or admit to their house, hotel, vehicle, means of transportation or place of amusement. Nor shall any right exist in favor of the person so refused admission.

The right of keepers of hotels and public houses, carriers of passengers and keepers of places of amusement and their employees to control the access and admission or exclusion of persons to or from their public houses, means of transportation and places of amusement is to be as complete as that of any private person over the private person's private house, vehicle, private theater or places of amusement for the private person's family.

Acts 1875, ch. 130, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 14, 17; Shan., § 3046; Code 1932, § 5262; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-710.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 12; 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 3.

62-7-110. Penalty for riotous conduct.

A right of action is given to any keeper of any hotel, inn, theater, public house, common carrier or restaurant against any person guilty of turbulent or riotous conduct within or about the hotel, inn, theater, public house, common carrier or restaurant, and any person found guilty of so doing commits a Class C misdemeanor. The owner or persons so offended against may sue in the owner's or offended person's own name for the turbulent or riotous conduct.

Acts 1875, ch. 130, § 2; Shan., § 3047; mod. Code 1932, § 5263; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-711; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Breach of the Peace, § 4; 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, §§ 3, 4.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1964 Tennessee Survey (James G. Kirby, Jr.), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1103.

62-7-111. Discrimination because of method of transportation prohibited.

It is unlawful for owners, proprietors, lessees, keepers, agents, employees or servants of any theaters, shows, parks, places of public resort for observation of scenery or amusement of any kind whatever, where a fee or toll is charged for admission into those places or premises, to refuse admission to any person on account of the fact that the person travels to and from the parks or places over a particular route, or in the vehicles, or other means of conveyance of any person rather than another. It is the duty of all owners, proprietors, lessees, or keepers of the public places to admit all well behaved persons upon equal terms, without regard to the particular route or means of conveyance.

All places kept open for the public and at which a fee or toll is charged, either at that place or for traveling over any route or railway, where the place is the inducement to such travel, shall be conclusively taken to fall within this section.

For each violation of this section, the proprietor, owner or lessee of the place or grounds, together with the keeper of gates or doors, shall forfeit no less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00), to be recovered by action of debt before any general sessions judge, at the suit of the individual who may be denied admission or at the suit of the person owning the vehicle or other mode of conveyance in which the person denied admission may have traveled to the place or ground. The owner, proprietor, lessee or keeper is also liable for all damage done to the business of the person who may be so discriminated against and may be restrained by injunction from continuing the discrimination.

This section shall be liberally construed so as to prevent evasions and subterfuges.

Acts 1885, ch. 68, §§ 1-3, 5; Shan., §§ 3041-3043, 3045; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5257-5259, 5261; modified; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-712 — 62-714, 62-716.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 3.

62-7-112. Dog guide to be admitted — Penalties.

No proprietor, employee or other person in charge of any place of public accommodation, amusement or recreation, including, but not limited to, any inn, hotel, restaurant, eating house, barber shop, billiard parlor, store, public conveyance on land or water, theater, motion picture house, public educational institution or elevator, shall refuse to permit a blind, physically disabled or deaf or hard of hearing person to enter the place or to make use of the accommodations provided when the accommodations are available, for the reason that the blind, physically disabled or deaf or hard of hearing person is being led or accompanied by a dog guide. A dog guide shall be under the control of its handler. A place of public accommodation shall not require documentation, such as proof that the animal has been certified, trained or licensed as a dog guide.

No proprietor, employee or other person in charge of any place of public accommodation, amusement or recreation, including, but not limited to, any inn, hotel, restaurant, eating house, barber shop, billiard parlor, store, public conveyance on land or water, theater, motion picture house, public educational institution or elevator, shall refuse to permit a dog guide trainer to enter such place or to make use of the accommodations provided in those places, when the accommodations are available, for the reason that the dog guide trainer is being led or accompanied by a dog guide in training; provided, that the dog guide in training, when led or accompanied by a dog guide trainer, is wearing a harness and is held on a leash by the dog guide trainer or, when led or accompanied by a dog guide trainer, is held on a leash by the dog guide trainer; and provided, further, that the dog guide trainer shall first have presented for inspection credentials issued by an accredited school for training dog guides.

For purposes of this section, “dog guide in training” includes dogs being raised for an accredited school for training dog guides; provided, however, that a dog being raised for that purpose is:

Being held on a leash and is under the control of its raiser or trainer, who shall have available for inspection credentials from the accredited school for which the dog is being raised; and

Wearing a collar, leash or other appropriate apparel or device that identifies the dog with the accredited school for which it is being raised.

“Dog guide in training” also includes the socialization process that occurs with the dog's trainer or raiser prior to the dog's advanced training; provided, that the socialization process is under the authorization of an accredited school.

A place of public accommodation may ask a person to remove a dog guide or dog guide in training from the premises if:

The dog guide or dog guide in training is out of control and its handler does not take effective action to control it; or

The dog guide or dog guide in training is not housebroken.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1955, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 488, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-717; Acts 1982, ch. 748, § 1; 1984, ch. 612, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 668, § 1; 2001, ch. 174, § 13; 2003, ch. 123, § 1; 2013, ch. 69, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hotels, Inns, Restaurants, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Requiring the display or presentation of training credentials as a condition for a guide dog's entry into a place of public accommodation is reasonable and is not inconsistent with federal law, OAG 01-156, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 174 (10/22/01).

The federal Americans with Disabilities Act does not conflict with, or preempt, the provisions T.C.A. § 62-7-112 addressing the admission of service dogs to places of public accommodation. OAG 13-59, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 60 (7/26/13).